Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 29 Medical Support

15-29-1.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to set forth procedures to enforce health care coverage provisions obtained pursuant to §

15-5-16.2(d)(2)

through the use of the National Medical Support Notice, subsequently referred to as the “medical notice.” However, the medical notice is not to be issued when the court orders an individual to contribute a weekly cash amount towards the health care coverage provided by the custodial parent or the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 314, § 3.

15-29-2.
Effective date.

For purposes of this chapter, with respect to all medical orders issued, enforced or modified in title IV-D of the Social Security Act, cases on or after October 1, 2002, in accordance with §

15-5-16.2.5

(repealed effective October 1, 2002), the medical notice, which is a qualified medical support order, shall be issued to the employer in every case by regular mail or electronic notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 314, § 3.

15-29-3.
Duty of employer to respond to medical notices.

The medical notice shall instruct the employer into which health care plans the children shall be enrolled and include all identifying information of the child support case. The medical notice shall comply in all respects with federal requirements.

The employer must respond, within twenty (20) business days after the date of the medical notice, or sooner, if reasonable, indicating:

That the employer does not maintain or contribute to plans providing dependant or family care coverage;

That the employee is among a class of employees that are not eligible for family health care coverage under any group health plan maintained by the employee;

That health care is not available because the employee is no longer employed; or

That state or federal withholding limitations and/or prioritization prevent the withholding from the employee’s income of the amount required to obtain coverage.

If family health care coverage is available, the employer is required to transfer the appropriate part of the medical notice to the plan administrator of each appropriate group health plan for which the children may be eligible.

Upon notification from the plan administrator that the children are enrolled, the employer must either:

Withhold from the employees income any contributions required within the limitations outlined in §

15-29-4

and transfer the contribution to the plan administrator; or

Complete the appropriate employee response portion of the notice and advise the child support agency that enrollment cannot be completed because of prioritization or limitations on additional withholding of income.

If there is a waiting period for enrollment based upon number of hours worked or passage of time, the employer must notify the plan administrator when the condition is met.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 314, § 3.

15-29-4.
Limitations on withholding.

The employer may not withhold more under the medical notice than the lesser of:

The amounts allowed by the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1673(b);

The amounts allowed by the state of the employee’s principal place of employment; or

The amount allowed for health care coverage premiums by the child support order. The federal limit applies to the aggregate disposal weekly earnings (ADWE). ADWE is the net income left after making mandatory deductions such as state, federal and local taxes, social security taxes, and Medicare taxes.

Priority of Withholding. If withholding is required for employee contributions to one or more health care coverage plans under the medical notice and for a support obligation under a separate notice, and available funds are insufficient for withholding for both cash and medical support contributions, the employer must withhold amounts for purposes of cash support and medical support contributions in accordance with the law, if any, of the state of the employee’s principal place of employment requiring prioritization between cash and medical support. If the principal place of employment is Rhode Island, cash support shall be a priority followed by medical support contributions.

Duration of withholding. Coverage of a dependent child shall continue until the child is no longer a dependent. The continuation coverage provisions of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act, of 1974, 29 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq., may entitle the child to continuation coverage under the plan. The employer must continue to withhold employee contributions and may not discontinue or eliminate health care coverage for the children unless the employer is provided satisfactory evidence that:

The court or administrative child support order referred to above is no longer in effect; or

The children are or will be enrolled in comparable health care coverage which will take effect no longer than the effective date of dis-enrollment from the plan; or

The employer eliminates family health care coverage for all of its employees.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 314, § 3.

15-29-5.
Employer sanctions.

An employer may be subject to a one hundred dollar ($100) fine or other penalties under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act, of 1974, 29 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq., for discharging an employee from employment, refusing to employ, or taking disciplinary action against any employee because of medical child support withholding or for failing to withhold income or transmit the withheld amounts to the applicable plan(s) as the medical notice directs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 314, § 3.

15-29-6.
Notice of termination of employment.

In any case in which the above employment terminates, the employer must promptly notify the division of taxation, child support enforcement agency of the termination within ten (10) days.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 314, § 3.

15-29-7.
Employee liability for contribution to the plan.

The employee is liable for any employee contributions that are required under the health care coverage plan for enrollment of the child(ren) and is subject to appropriate enforcement. The employee may contest the withholding under the medical notice based upon a mistake of fact. Should an employee contest the withholding under the medical notice, the employer must proceed to comply with the employer responsibilities in the medical notice until notified by the division of taxation, child support enforcement or other issuing agency to discontinue withholding. To contest the withholding, the employee should contact the division of taxation, child support enforcement or other issuing agency at the address and telephone number listed on the medical notice form.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 314, § 3.

15-29-8.
Plan administrator obligations regarding enrollment.

The medical notice shall be forwarded by the employer to the plan administrator. The plan administrator is obligated to provide health care coverage of the child(ren) under the group health plan described in the medical notice within forty (40) business days of the date of the notice, or sooner if reasonable.

The plan administrator must complete the plan administrator response and send it to the issuing agency.

If there is health care coverage available for the child(ren), the plan administrator shall notify the non-custodial parent of the coverage available and the effective date of the coverage and complete any forms documents or information necessary to effectuate and submit claims for the coverage.

If there is more than one option available for health care coverage, the plan administrator must provide a detailed summary plan description that describes all available coverages, including a default option coverage plan. The issuing child support agency must, in conjunction with the custodial parent, select one of the available options within twenty (20) days or the child(ren) will be enrolled in a default plan.

If there has been no response from the issuing agency as to which option is selected, the plan administrator shall enroll the child(ren) in the default option coverage plan.

The plan administrator shall notify the issuing agency if there is a waiting period for the participant. Upon expiration of the required waiting period for enrollment, the plan administrator shall enroll the child(ren) in the health coverage plan.

If the plan administrator determines the medical notice does not constitute a qualified medical child support order, the reasons must be specified in the response.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 314, § 3.

15-29-9.
Plan administrator — Unlawful refusal to enroll.

Enrollment of a child may not be denied for any of the following reasons:

The child(ren) was born out of wedlock;

The child is not claimed as a dependant on the participant’s federal income tax return;

The child does not reside with the participant or in the plan’s service area; or

The child is receiving benefits or is eligible to receive benefits under a state’s medical plan.

If the health care coverage plan requires that the participant must be currently enrolled, the plan administrator must enroll both the participant and the child(ren).

All enrollments are to be made without regard to open season restrictions.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 314, § 3.

15-29-10.
Payment of claims.

The following individuals or entities are eligible to file claims under the health care coverage plan:

A child covered by the medical order;

The child’s custodial parent or legal guardian;

The provider of services to the child(ren); or

A state agency to which the child(ren) or parents rights have been assigned.

The plan administrator shall pay for covered benefits or reimbursement directly to the party.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 314, § 3.